nl: Handgreepontwerp: Pistool; Steil; Andere
lt-LT: Rankenos dizainas: Pistoletas; Tiesi; Kita
vi: Thiết kế tay cầm: Kiểu báng súng; Tóc thẳng; Khác
bg-BG: Дизайн на дръжката: Пистолет; Права; Други
ro-RO: Design mâner: Pistol; Drept; Altele
fr: Design de la poignée: Pistolet; Lisses; Autre
sv: Handtagsdesign: Pistol; Rakt; Övrigt
sl-SI: Zasnova ročaja: Pištola; Ravna; Drugo
cs: Tvar rukojeti: Pistole; Rovné; Jiné
zh-CN: 手柄设计: 枪式; 直; 其他
zh-TW: 手柄設計: 手槍式; 直; 其他
el: Σχέδιο λαβής: Πιστόλι; Ευθεία; Άλλο
da: Håndtagsdesign: Pistol; Lige; Andet
tr: Sap Tasarımı: Tabanca; Düz; Diğer
pt-PT: Design do punho: Pistola; Liso; Outro
it: Forma del manico: A pistola; Dritto; Altro
de: Griffdesign: Pistole; Glatt; Sonstiges
hu: Fogantyú kialakítása: Pisztoly; Egyenes; Egyéb
es: Diseño de mango: Pistola; Liso; Otros
pl: Konstrukcja uchwytu: Pistolet; Prosta; Inne
ja: ハンドルのデザイン: ピストル; ストレート; その他
th: การออกแบบด้ามจับ: ด้ามปืน; ผมตรง; อื่นๆ
en: Handle design: Pistol; Straight; Other
pt-BR: Formato da alça: Pistola; Liso; Outro
sk-SK: Dizajn rukoväte: Pištoľ; Rovný; Iné
ru: Конструкция рукоятки: Пистолет; Прямой; Другое
ko: 핸들 디자인: 피스톨; 일자형; 기타
hr-HR: Dizajn drške: Pištoljski; Ravna; Ostalo
nb: Håndtakdesign: Pistol; Rett; Annet
fi: Kahvan muotoilu: Pistooli; Suorat; Muu